Utah statutes.
26-23a-2.   Injury reporting requirements by health care provider --
Contents of report.
(1)  (a)  Any health care provider who treats or cares for any person who
suffers from any wound or other injury inflicted by the person's own act or by
the act of another by means of a knife, gun, pistol, explosive, infernal
device, or deadly weapon, or by violation of any criminal statute of this
state, shall immediately report to a law enforcement agency the facts
regarding the injury.
(b)  The report shall state the name and address of the injured person, if
known, the person's whereabouts, the character and extent of the person's
injuries, and the name, address, and telephone number of the person making the
report.
(2)  A health care provider may not be discharged, suspended, disciplined, or
harassed for making a report pursuant to this section.
(3)  A person may not incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of
making any report required by this section.
(4)  A health care provider who has personal knowledge that the report of a
wound or injury has been made in compliance with this section is under no
further obligation to make a report regarding that wound or injury under this
section.
